California, session 20252026, AB2544.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 9.1 (commencing with Section 12100.95) is added to Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 9.1. Education for Filmmakers Pilot Program12100.95. (a) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall establish and administer a pilot program to develop a model for delivering high-quality, workforce-centered artificial intelligence literacy instruction focused on careers in the entertainment industry.(b) The pilot program shall pursue all of the following objectives:(1) Provide workers and students with a clear understanding of the current capabilities and limitations of artificial intelligence tools and the role artificial intelligence tools play in real production workflows.(2) Collaborate with industry partners, labor unions, and guilds to identify priority topics and map instructional content to current and evolving artificial intelligence capabilities in the entertainment industry.(3) Develop curriculum that is ready for integration into workforce training programs, public education partnerships, and continuing education channels.(4) Enhance, rather than replace, professional craft by providing upskilling and reskilling opportunities.(5) Create a connected training pipeline that links learning directly to employment opportunities.(6) Train students to use tools responsibly, to expand opportunities, and to help shape the future of creative work.(c) Curriculum developed pursuant to this article shall be designed in coordination with labor unions, guilds, and industry partners to support access for professionals, educators, and students, and shall be suitable for integration into workforce training programs, continuing education channels, and public education partnerships.(d) The office shall seek to enter into partnerships with entertainment industry unions and guilds, entertainment industry employers, film schools, postsecondary institutions, and technology companies to support the development and delivery of the pilot program.(e) The office shall ensure the pilot program promotes equitable access to instruction for students and workers from underrepresented communities.12100.96. (a) The office shall conduct, or contract for the completion of, a comprehensive evaluation of the pilot program. The evaluation shall assess, at minimum, all of the following:(1) Effectiveness of the pilot program in improving artificial intelligence literacy and employment outcomes for participating students and workers.(2) Potential applicability of the pilot program as a model to other industries and sectors of the state’s economy.(3) Models of public-private partnership that bring together labor, business, and technology companies to serve the best interests of workers, businesses, and the state’s economic competitiveness.(4) Recommendations for scaling successful approaches to additional schools, institutions, and industry sectors statewide to ensure that the state’s workforce remains competitive in the global economy.(b) On or before January 1, 2029, the office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795, summarizing the results of the evaluation conducted pursuant to this section and any recommendations for continuation, modification, or expansion of the pilot program.12100.97. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 33548 of the Education Code is amended to read:33548.(a)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Artificial Intelligence (AI) literacy” means the knowledge, skills, and attitudes associated with how artificial intelligence works, including its principles, concepts, and applications, and how to use artificial intelligence, including its limitations, implications, and ethical considerations.(2)“Digital citizenship” means a diverse set of skills related to current technology and social media, including the norms of appropriate, responsible, and healthy behavior.(3)“Media literacy” means the ability to access, evaluate, analyze, and use media and information, and encompasses the foundational skills that lead to digital citizenship.(b)When the English language arts/English language development (ELA/ELD) curriculum framework is next revised after January 1, 2024, the commission shall consider incorporating the Model Library Standards developed pursuant to Section 18101. The commission shall also consider incorporating media literacy content at each grade level.(c)(1)The commission shall consider incorporating media literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after January 1, 2024.(2)When ELA/ELD instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including the Model Library Standards developed pursuant to Section 18101, including media literacy content, in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.(3)When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including media literacy content in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.(d)(1)The commission shall consider incorporating AI literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after January 1, 2025.(2)When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including AI literacy content in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.